Utah statutes.
63A-9-601.   Marking of vehicles.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), all motor vehicles owned, leased for use, or operated by the state shall display an identification mark and "EX" plates where required by Section 41-1a-407.

(b)  The division is responsible for ensuring that vehicles owned or leased by the state are marked.

(c)  The division shall enact rules relating to the size and design of the identification mark.

(2)  The identification mark shall be clear, distinct, and kept free from defacement, mutilation, grease, and other obscuring matter so that it is plainly visible at all times.

(3)  Each person operating a state vehicle without the proper designation is guilty of an infraction.

(4)  Vehicles used in official investigative work where secrecy is essential are exempt from the requirements of this section.

(5)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the division may grant security exemptions to the identification mark and "EX" plate requirement when the division:

(a)  receives a request for an exemption; and

(b)  determines there is a substantial danger to the person to whom the vehicle is assigned if the vehicle is identified as a state vehicle.

